Missouri, session 2026, SB963.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 167, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 167.1002, to read as
follows:
167.1002. 1. At least twice during each school year,
the school board of each school district and the governing
body of each charter school shall offer to each student who
is at least seventeen years and six months of age the
opportunity to register to vote in accordance with the
provisions of this section.
2. A school district or charter school shall allow
each student who is at least seventeen years and six months
of age to register to vote during school hours on the fourth
Tuesday in September of each year, or on the next available
school day if school is not in session on that day.
3. A school district or charter school shall
coordinate with the local election authority in whose
jurisdiction such district or school is located to organize
a second opportunity to allow each student who is at least
seventeen years and six months of age to register to vote
during school hours. Such opportunity shall occur later

SB 963 2
than the date provided in subsection 2 of this section and
shall be conducted by the local election authority.
4. The secretary of state shall prepare informational
materials regarding voter registration to be distributed at
each voter registration activity conducted pursuant to the
provisions of this section.
5. Each school district and charter school shall file
a report regarding voter registration activities conducted
pursuant to the provisions of this section with the
department of elementary and secondary education by December
thirty-first of each year.
✓